Utah statutes.
57-9-7.   Existing statutes of limitations and recording statutes not affected.

Nothing contained in this act shall be construed to extend the period for the bringing of an action or for the doing of any other required act under any statutes of limitations, nor, except as herein specifically provided, to affect the operation of any statutes governing the effect of the recording or the failure to record any instrument affecting land.



Enacted by Chapter 109, 1963 General Session

